netlify/functions/hello-world/verbs.dix
    <pardef n="mr_Q_il">
        <e><p><l>il</l><r>Q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_Q_Ir">
        <e><p><l>Ir</l><r>Q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_Q_Ur">
        <e><p><l>Ur</l><r>Q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_Q_er">
        <e><p><l>er</l><r>Q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_L_al">
        <e><p><l>al</l><r>L</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_e_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>e</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_e_i">
        <e><p><l>i</l><r>e</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_e_I">
        <e><p><l>I</l><r>e</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_e_ay">
        <e><p><l>ay</l><r>e</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_e_Ay">
        <e><p><l>Ay</l><r>e</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_e">
        <e><p><l></l><r>e</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_E_e">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r>E</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_E_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>E</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_E_Ay">
        <e><p><l>Ay</l><r>E</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_E">
        <e><p><l></l><r>E</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_o">
        <e><p><l>o</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_o_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>o</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_o_I">
        <e><p><l>I</l><r>o</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_o_e">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r>o</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_o_Ay">
        <e><p><l>Ay</l><r>o</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_o">
        <e><p><l></l><r>o</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_c">
        <e><p><l>c</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_c_k">
        <e><p><l>k</l><r>c</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_c">
        <e><p><l></l><r>c</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_C_k">
        <e><p><l>k</l><r>C</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_C_R">
        <e><p><l>R</l><r>C</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_j_k">
        <e><p><l>k</l><r>j</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_j_kR">
        <e><p><l>kR</l><r>j</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_j_R">
        <e><p><l>R</l><r>j</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_j">
        <e><p><l></l><r>j</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_jj_k">
        <e><p><l>k</l><r>jj</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_jj_R">
        <e><p><l>R</l><r>jj</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_Fj_f">
        <e><p><l>f</l><r>Fj</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_nj_f">
        <e><p><l>f</l><r>nj</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_nS">
        <e><p><l></l><r>nS</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_Fj_fk">
        <e><p><l>fk</l><r>Fj</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_t_w">
        <e><p><l>w</l><r>t</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_x_d">
        <e><p><l>d</l><r>x</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_x_w">
        <e><p><l>w</l><r>x</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_x_j">
        <e><p><l>j</l><r>x</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_x">
        <e><p><l></l><r>x</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_X_w">
        <e><p><l>w</l><r>X</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_X_x">
        <e><p><l>x</l><r>X</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_X">
        <e><p><l></l><r>X</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_n_M">
        <e><p><l>M</l><r>n</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_n_f">
        <e><p><l>f</l><r>n</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_n_F">
        <e><p><l>F</l><r>n</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_n_N">
        <e><p><l>N</l><r>n</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_n_m">
        <e><p><l>m</l><r>n</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_n">
        <e><p><l></l><r>n</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_nj_fk">
        <e><p><l>fk</l><r>nj</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_nj">
        <e><p><l></l><r>nj</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_nc">
        <e><p><l></l><r>nc</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_N">
        <e><p><l></l><r>N</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_N_n">
        <e><p><l>n</l><r>N</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_p">
        <e><p><l>p</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_p_b">
        <e><p><l>b</l><r>p</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_b_B">
        <e><p><l>B</l><r>b</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_B_p">
        <e><p><l>p</l><r>B</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_B_b">
        <e><p><l>b</l><r>B</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_m_n">
        <e><p><l>n</l><r>m</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_m_N">
        <e><p><l>N</l><r>m</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_m_M">
        <e><p><l>M</l><r>m</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_Ms_fk">
        <e><p><l>fk</l><r>Ms</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_MS_fk">
        <e><p><l>fk</l><r>MS</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_h_k">
        <e><p><l>k</l><r>h</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_h_g">
        <e><p><l>g</l><r>h</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_h_G">
        <e><p><l>G</l><r>h</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_h_x">
        <e><p><l>x</l><r>h</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_h_w">
        <e><p><l>w</l><r>h</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_ya_i">
        <e><p><l>i</l><r>ya</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_ya_I">
        <e><p><l>I</l><r>ya</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_yA_i">
        <e><p><l>i</l><r>yA</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_yA_I">
        <e><p><l>I</l><r>yA</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_ye_I">
        <e><p><l>I</l><r>ye</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_v">
        <e><p><l></l><r>v</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_va_u">
        <e><p><l>u</l><r>va</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_va_U">
        <e><p><l>U</l><r>va</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_vi_U">
        <e><p><l>U</l><r>vi</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_ve_U">
        <e><p><l>U</l><r>ve</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_ve_O">
        <e><p><l>O</l><r>ve</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_ra_q">
        <e><p><l>q</l><r>ra</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_ras_ar">
        <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ras</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_ras_Ar">
        <e><p><l>Ar</l><r>ras</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_S_k">
        <e><p><l>k</l><r>S</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_S_R">
        <e><p><l>R</l><r>S</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_sc_R">
        <e><p><l>R</l><r>sc</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_S">
        <e><p><l></l><r>S</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_R">
        <e><p><l>R</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_R_k">
        <e><p><l>k</l><r>R</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_R_s">
        <e><p><l>s</l><r>R</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_s">
        <e><p><l>s</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_s_j">
        <e><p><l>j</l><r>s</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_s_w">
        <e><p><l>w</l><r>s</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_s_S">
        <e><p><l>S</l><r>s</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_s_R">
        <e><p><l>R</l><r>s</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_s">
        <e><p><l></l><r>s</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_sj">
        <e><p><l></l><r>sj</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="md_sw">
        <e><p><l></l><r>sw</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_w_t">
        <e><p><l>t</l><r>w</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_Ay">
        <e><p><l>Ay</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_ay">
        <e><p><l>ay</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="xe1"><i>x</i><par n="mr_e_I"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="xo1"><i>x</i><par n="mr_o_I"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="gQ2"><i>g</i><par n="mr_Q_Ir"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_kryAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="wunp2"><i>wu</i><par n="md_n"/><i>p</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="XrE1"><i>Xr</i><par n="mr_E_A"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_w"/></e>
    <e lm="SE1"><i>S</i><par n="mr_E_Ay"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="vye1"><i>vy</i><par n="mr_e_A"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_w"/></e>
    <e lm="vye1"><i>vy</i><par n="mr_e_Ay"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="Ro1"><par n="mr_R_s"/><par n="mr_o_A"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_xivAxi_w"/></e>
    <e lm="Ro1"><par n="mr_R_s"/><par n="mr_o_Ay"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_xivAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="BQ1"><i>B</i><par n="mr_Q_Ur"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_kryAxi_R_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="yuC1"><i>yu</i><par n="ma_c"/><i>C</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="axd1"><i>a</i><par n="mr_x_d"/><i>d</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="RtuB1"><par n="mr_R_s"/><par n="mr_t_w"/><par n="mr_u_o"/><i>B</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="NiS1"><par n="mr_N_n"/><par n="mr_i_e"/><i>S</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="syanx1"><i>syan</i><par n="md_x"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_w"/></e>
    <e lm="ranj2"><i>ra</i><par n="mr_nj_fk"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lut_krm_xivAxi_w"/></e>
    <e lm="Rvix2"><par n="mr_R_s"/><i>v</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_x_w"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lut_krm_xivAxi_w"/></e>
    <e lm="RiX3"><par n="mr_R_s"/><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_X_x"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lut_krm_xivAxi_X"/></e>
    <e lm="Brasj1"><i>Bra</i><par n="md_s"/><par n="mr_j_R"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_wuxAxi_t"/></e>
    <e lm="wqnh1"><par n="at_a"/><i>wq</i><par n="mr_n_f"/><par n="mr_h_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_wuxAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="praC1"><i>pra</i><par n="mr_C_R"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_wuxAxi_t"/></e>
    <e lm="praC1"><par n="at_a"/><i>pra</i><par n="mr_C_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_wuxAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="ruj1"><par n="at_a"/><i>r</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><par n="mr_j_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_wuxAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="ruX1"><par n="at_a"/><i>r</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><par n="mr_X_w"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_ruXAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="ric1"><i>r</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_c_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_ruXAxi_w"/></e>
    <e lm="anj1"><i>a</i><par n="mr_n_F"/><i>j</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_ruXAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="lad3"><par n="ma_o"/><i>la</i><par n="ma_N"/><i>d</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="kLp1"><i>k</i><par n="mr_L_al"/><i>p</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="srans1"><par n="ab_sa"/><i>sra</i><par n="mr_n_M"/><i>s</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="SE1"><par n="ab_Sa"/><i>S</i><par n="md_E"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="me1"><par n="ab_ma"/><i>m</i><par n="md_e"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_A"/></e>
    <e lm="Rnusa1"><par n="ab_su"/><i>R</i><par n="mr_n_N"/><i>us</i><par n="md_a"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Ro1"><par n="ab_sa"/><par n="mr_R_s"/><par n="md_o"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="uxJ1"><i>u</i><par n="mr_x_j"/><i>J</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi_Am"/></e>
    <e lm="wunP2"><par n="ab_wu"/><i>wu</i><par n="mr_n_m"/><i>P</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="jQ2"><i>j</i><par n="mr_Q_er"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi"/></e>
